California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(a) The department may authorize, under this chapter, by permit, the take or possession of the blunt-nosed leopard lizard (Gambelia sila) resulting from impacts attributable to or otherwise related to the Allensworth Community Services District’s drilling and construction of a new water well, connection of the new water well to the existing distribution system, and construction of a new water storage tank, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied for the take of the blunt-nosed leopard lizard.

(2) The take authorization
 provides for the development and implementation of a monitoring program and an adaptive management plan, approved by the department, for monitoring the effectiveness of, and adjusting as necessary, the measures to minimize and fully mitigate the impacts of the authorized take.

(b) The permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall cover any incidental take of a blunt-nosed leopard lizard that may occur in the course of implementing mitigation or conservation actions required in the permit.

(c) The permit conditions are subject to amendment when required by the monitoring program and adaptive management plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) This section shall not be construed to exempt the
 projects described in subdivision (a) from any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   (SB 495)   Effective August 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.13.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 3511 and 4700, the department may authorize, under this chapter, the incidental take of the salt-marsh harvest mouse (Reithrodontomys raviventris), the California Ridgway’s rail (Rallus obsoletus obsoletus), the California black rail (Laterallus jamaicensis coturniculus), and the white-tailed kite (Elanus leucurus) resulting from impacts attributable to the
 Sears Point to Mare Island Improvement Project on State Route 37 from east of Lakeville Highway near State Route 121 in the County of Sonoma to west of Sacramento Street in the County of Solano through the Counties of Sonoma, Napa, and Solano, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied as to the species for which take is authorized.

(2) The department ensures that all further measures necessary to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805
 are incorporated into each project and take is avoided to the maximum extent possible as to the species for which take is authorized.

(3) The take authorization provides for development and implementation of a monitoring program and an adaptive management
 plan, both of which shall be approved by the department, that satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 for monitoring the effectiveness of, and amending, as necessary, the measures to minimize and fully mitigate the impacts of the authorized take.

(4) The applicant pays a permit application fee consistent with Section 2081.2.

(b) A permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall cover any incidental take of a species for which take is authorized that may occur in the course of implementing mitigation or conservation actions required in the permit.

(c) The permit conditions are subject to amendment when required by the monitoring program and adaptive management
 plan
 adopted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) This section shall not be construed to exempt the project described in subdivision (a) from any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2081.15.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 3511, 4700, 5050, and 5515, and subject to the requirements set forth in subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive, the department may authorize under this chapter by permit the take of species listed in subdivision (b) of Section 3511, subdivision (b) of Section 4700, subdivision (b) of Section 5050, and subdivision (b) of Section 5515 resulting from impacts attributable to the implementation of the projects identified in subdivision (b) if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2081 are satisfied as to the species for which take is authorized.

(2) The department ensures that all further
 measures necessary to satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 and take is avoided to the maximum extent possible as to the species for which take is authorized are incorporated into each project.

(3) The take authorization permit provides for the development and implementation, in cooperation with the department, and federal and state agencies, as applicable, of a monitoring program and an adaptive management plan, approved by the department, that satisfy the conservation standard of subdivision (d) of Section 2805 for monitoring the effectiveness of, and amending, as necessary, the measures to minimize and fully mitigate the impacts of the authorized take.

(4) The applicant pays a permit application fee consistent with Section 2081.2.

(b) Projects or categories of projects eligible for a
 take authorization permit pursuant to this section are limited to all of the following:

(1) A maintenance, repair, or improvement project to the State Water Project, including existing infrastructure, undertaken by the Department of Water Resources.

(2) A maintenance, repair, or improvement project to critical regional or local water agency infrastructure.

(3) A transportation project, including any associated habitat connectivity and wildlife crossing project, undertaken by a state, regional, or local agency, that does not increase highway or street capacity for automobile or truck travel.

(4) A wind project and any appurtenant infrastructure improvement, and any associated electric transmission project carrying electric power from a facility that is
 located in the state to a point of junction with any California-based balancing authority.

(5) A solar photovoltaic project and any appurtenant infrastructure improvement, and any associated electric transmission project carrying electric power from a facility that is located in the state to a point of junction with any California-based balancing authority.

(c) A permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall cover any incidental take of a species for which take is authorized that may occur in the course of implementing mitigation or conservation actions required in the permit.

(d) The permit conditions are subject to amendment when required by the monitoring program and adaptive management plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(e) (1) This section does not apply to the design or construction of through-delta water conveyances in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(2) This section does not apply to the design or construction of ocean desalination projects.

(f) This section shall not be construed to exempt the projects or categories of projects identified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) from any other law.

(g) (1) The department shall not issue new take authorization permits pursuant to this section on or after December 31, 2033.

(2) Take authorization permits issued pursuant to this section before December 31, 2033, shall continue to remain in effect. 

(h) The department shall develop a plan on or before July 1, 2024, to assess the population status of each fully protected species. The plan shall include recommendations to the Legislature for resources necessary to determine the scientific status of each fully protected species.

(i) On or before July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the relevant policy and budget committees of the Legislature regarding the implementation of this section. The report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(1) For each individual permit issued to take a fully protected species pursuant to this section, all of the following information: 

(A) The type and location of the project for which the permit was
 issued, including the county in which the project is located.

(B) The fully protected species at risk due to the project and any take of the fully protected species due to the project in the preceding calendar year. 

(C) Actions taken to avoid, minimize, and fully mitigate the take of, and to conserve, the fully protected species.

(D) A description of the monitoring program, including observation frequency, and any adaptive management-driven modifications to the monitoring program in the preceding calendar year.

(2) The cost to the department of the implementation of this section in the preceding calendar year broken down by task.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 59, Sec. 2.   (SB 147)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2082.

This chapter does not prohibit the sale of any endangered species or threatened species, or any part or product thereof, when the owner can demonstrate that the species, or part or product thereof, was in the person’s possession before the date upon which the commission listed the species as an endangered species or threatened species or as an endangered animal or rare animal prior to January 1, 1985, and shall not prohibit the sale of that part or product by an individual not normally engaged in that sale if it was originally possessed by the seller for the seller’s own use and so used by that seller. However, it shall be unlawful to sell any species, or part or product thereof, if that sale would have been unlawful prior to the date upon which the commission added the species to the listing of endangered species or threatened species or to the listing of endangered animals or rare animals prior to January 1, 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2083.

This chapter does not apply to the taking of fish otherwise authorized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 6 or to the possession of individual animals which were lawfully possessed before the commission listed the species as an endangered species or as a threatened species or as an endangered animal or rare animal prior to January 1, 1985.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2084.

(a) The commission may authorize, subject to terms and conditions it prescribes, and based on the best available scientific information, (1) the taking of any candidate species, or (2) the taking of any fish by hook and line for sport that is listed as an endangered, threatened, or candidate species, provided that in either case the take is consistent with this chapter.

(b) The department may recommend to the commission that the commission authorize, or not authorize, the taking of an endangered, threatened, or candidate species pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 14.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2085.

The provisions of this article shall apply to any species designated as a candidate species under Section 2074.2 if notice has been given pursuant to Section 2074.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Incidental Take Associated with Routine and Ongoing Activities [2086. - 2089.]

2086.

(a) The department, in cooperation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, agricultural commissioners, extension agents, farmers, ranchers, and other agricultural experts, shall adopt regulations that authorize locally designed voluntary programs for routine and ongoing agricultural activities on farms or ranches that encourage habitat for candidate, threatened, and endangered species, and wildlife generally. Agricultural commissioners, extension agents, farmers, ranchers, or other agricultural experts, in cooperation with conservation groups, may propose those programs to the department.

(b) Programs authorized under subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Include management practices
 that will, to the maximum extent practicable, avoid and minimize take of candidate, endangered, and threatened species, while encouraging the enhancement of habitat.

(2) Be supported by the best available scientific information for both agricultural and conservation practices.

(3) Be consistent with the policies and goals of this chapter.

(4) Be designed to provide sufficient flexibility to maximize participation and to gain the maximum wildlife benefits without compromising the economics of agricultural operations.

(5) Include terms and conditions to allow farmers or ranchers to cease participation in a program without penalty. The terms and conditions shall include reasonable measures to minimize take during withdrawal from the program.

(c) Any taking of candidate, threatened, or endangered species incidental to routine and ongoing agricultural activities that occurs while the management practices specified by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) are followed, is not prohibited by this chapter.

(d) (1) The department shall automatically renew the authorization for these voluntary programs every five years, unless the Legislature amends or repeals this section in which case the program shall be revised to conform to this section.

(2) Commencing in 2000, and every five years thereafter, the department shall post a report regarding the effect of the programs on its internet website. The department shall consult with the Department of Food and Agriculture in evaluating the programs and preparing the report. The report shall address
 factors such as the temporary and permanent acreage benefiting from the programs, include an estimate of the amount of land upon which routine and ongoing agricultural activities are conducted, provide examples of farmer and rancher cooperation, and include recommendations to improve the voluntary participation by farmers and ranchers.

(e) If the authorization for these programs is not renewed or is modified under subdivision (d), persons participating in the program shall be allowed to cease participating in the program in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), without penalty.

(f) (1) The department may approve an application submitted by an agricultural-based nonprofit organization or other entity registered as a California nonprofit organization to initiate and undertake public education and outreach
 activities that promote the achievement of the objectives of this chapter. An application submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall include the following:

(A) The name and contact information of the participating organization.

(B) A brief description of the planned outreach activities.

(C) An end date for the outreach activities.

(2) The department may require a participating organization to submit, for approval by the department, educational materials and outreach materials that are disseminated to the public in furtherance of this subdivision.

(3) A participating organization shall file an annual report with the department before the end of each calendar year during the time period
 specified in the application. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Complete information on the activities conducted by the participating organization in the prior year, including a description of all means of communicating to the public and agricultural community, including personal visits, electronic communications, organized meetings, or other means.

(B) A compilation of responses from the public and members of the agricultural community that will assist the participating organization and the department to modify or improve public education and outreach activities on an ongoing basis.

(C) An assessment of the existing knowledge within the agricultural community of programs and prohibitions under this chapter and a review of outreach activities that could be used to adapt and improve
 future outreach efforts.

(D) Information on a farm or ranch that has expressed interest in participating in a voluntary program pursuant to this section or the safe harbor agreement program contained in Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 2089.2). This provision does not require the annual report to include the identification to the department of an individual, farm, or ranch.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 42.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2087.

(a) An accidental take of a candidate, threatened, or endangered species resulting from an act by a person acting as a farmer or rancher, a bona fide employee of a farmer or rancher, or an individual otherwise contracted by a farmer or rancher that occurs on a farm or a ranch in the course of otherwise lawful routine and ongoing agricultural activities is not prohibited by this chapter.

(b) (1) When an accidental take is known to occur under subdivision (a), the person shall report the take to the department within 10 days.

(2) The department shall conduct outreach to the extent feasible using existing channels to raise awareness of this reporting requirement within the agricultural community.

(c) For purposes of this section, “accidental” means unintended or unforeseen.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2088.

This article does not authorize the take of fish species and does not apply to timber harvesting governed by the State Board of Forestry. “Fish species” as used in this section means a member of the class Osteichthyes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.

Routine and ongoing agricultural activities shall be defined by the department by regulation and shall not include the conversion of agricultural land to a nonagricultural use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. California State Safe Harbor Agreement Program Act [2089.2. - 2089.25.]

2089.2.

(a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the California State Safe Harbor Agreement Program Act.

(b) The Legislature finds that a key to the goals set forth in this article of conserving, protecting, restoring, and enhancing endangered, threatened, and candidate species, is their habitat. A significant portion of the state’s current and potential habitat for these species exists on property owned by private citizens, municipalities, tribes, and other nonfederal entities. Conservation efforts on these lands and waters are critical to help these declining species. Using a collaborative stewardship approach to these lands and waters will help ensure the success of these efforts.

(c) The
 purpose of this article is to establish a program that will encourage landowners to manage their lands voluntarily to benefit endangered, threatened, or candidate species, or declining or vulnerable species, and not be subject to additional regulatory restrictions as a result of their conservation efforts.

(d) This article does not relieve landowners of any legal obligation with respect to endangered, threatened, or candidate species existing on their land. The program established by this article is designed to increase species populations, create new habitats, and enhance existing habitats. Although this increase may be temporary or long term, California state safe harbor agreements shall not reduce the existing populations of species present at the time the baseline is established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 15.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.4.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Agreement” means a state safe harbor agreement approved by the department pursuant to this article. “Agreement” includes an agreement with an individual landowner and a programmatic agreement.

(b) “Baseline conditions” means the existing estimated population size, the extent and quality of habitat, or both population size and the extent and quality of habitat, for the species on the land to be enrolled in the agreement that sustain seasonal or permanent use by the covered species. Baseline conditions shall be determined by the department, in consultation with the applicant, and shall be based on the best available science and objective scientific methodologies.
 For purposes of establishing baseline conditions, a qualified person that is not employed by the department may conduct habitat surveys, if that person has appropriate species expertise and has been approved by the department.

(c) “Declining or vulnerable species” include candidate species, species proposed for listing as an endangered or threatened species pursuant to this chapter, or species that the department determines may, in the near future, be candidate species or proposed for listing as an endangered or threatened species pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Fish and Wildlife, acting through its director or their designee.

(e) “Landowner” means any person or nonstate, state, or federal entity or entities that lawfully hold any interest in land or water to which they are
 committing to implement the requirements of this article.

(f) “Management actions” means activities on the enrolled land or water that are reasonably expected by the department to provide a net benefit to the species or their habitat, or both.

(g) “Monitoring program” means a program established or approved by the department in accordance with paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 2089.6.

(h) “Net conservation benefit” means the cumulative benefits of the management activities identified in the agreement that provide for an increase in a species’ population or the enhancement, restoration, or maintenance of covered species’ suitable habitats within the enrolled property. Net conservation benefit shall take into account the length of the agreement, any offsetting adverse effects attributable to the incidental
 taking allowed by the agreement, and other mutually agreed upon factors. Net conservation benefits shall be sufficient to contribute either directly or indirectly to the recovery of the covered species. These benefits include, but are not limited to, reducing fragmentation and increasing the connectivity of habitats, maintaining or increasing populations, enhancing and restoring habitats, and buffering protected areas.

(i) “Programmatic agreement” means a state safe harbor agreement issued to a governmental or nongovernmental program administrator. The program administrator for a programmatic agreement shall work with landowners and the department to implement the agreement. The program administrator and the department shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with the terms of the agreement.

(j) “Qualified person” means a person with species expertise who has been approved by
 the department.

(k) “Return to baseline” means, at the termination of an agreement, activities undertaken by the landowner to return the species population or extent or quality of habitat to baseline, excluding catastrophic events such as floods, unplanned fires, or earthquakes, and other factors mutually agreed upon before permit issuance and that are beyond the control of the landowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 681, Sec. 3.   (AB 1581)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.5.

(a) The department shall, to the maximum extent practicable, prioritize the review of, and decision to approve, an agreement if the property proposed to be enrolled in the agreement is encumbered by a conservation easement that requires a permanent commitment to protect, restore, and maintain habitat conditions, provided that the department finds that practices consistent with the conservation easement can reasonably be expected to provide a net conservation benefit to the species listed in the application.

(b) If the property proposed to be enrolled in an agreement is subject to a conservation easement, the department, to the maximum extent practicable, shall rely on the conservation easement to fulfill the requirements of Section 2089.8.

(c) This section only applies to agreements where a majority of the property is forestland.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 17.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.6.

(a) In addition to the other provisions of this article, the department may authorize acts that are or may become otherwise prohibited pursuant to Section 2000, 2080, or 2085 through an agreement, including a programmatic agreement, if all the following conditions are met:

(1) The department receives a complete application containing all of the information described in Section 2089.8.

(2) The take is incidental to an otherwise lawful activity.

(3) The department finds that the implementation of the agreement is reasonably expected to provide a net conservation benefit to the species listed in the application. This finding shall be based,
 at a minimum, upon the determination that the agreement is of sufficient duration and has appropriate assurances to realize these benefits.

(4) The take authorized by the agreement will not jeopardize the continued existence of the species. This determination shall be made based on the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 2081.

(5) The department finds that the landowner has agreed, to the maximum extent practicable, to avoid or minimize any incidental take authorized in the agreement, including returning to baseline.

(6) The department has established or approved a monitoring program, based upon objective scientific methodologies, to provide information for the department to evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of the agreement program, including whether the net conservation benefits set forth in the
 agreement are being achieved and whether the participating landowner is implementing the provisions of the agreement.

(7) The department has determined that sufficient funding is ensured, for it or its contractors or agents, to determine baseline conditions on the property, and that there is sufficient funding for the landowner to carry out management actions and for monitoring for the duration of the agreement.

(8) Implementation of the agreement will not be in conflict with any existing department-approved conservation or recovery programs for the species covered by the agreement.

(b) If the species covered by an agreement is a declining or vulnerable species, and the species is subsequently listed as an endangered, threatened, or candidate species pursuant to this chapter, no further authorization or approval
 shall be required for take of the species in accordance with the agreement, regardless of the species’ change in status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 18.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.7.

The department may authorize the taking of the Owens pupfish in the Owens River watershed if the take is authorized under an agreement pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 515, Sec. 1.   (AB 2001)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.8.

The landowner shall submit all of the following:

(a) A detailed map depicting the land proposed to be enrolled in the agreement.

(b) The common and scientific names of the species for which the landowner requests incidental take authorization.

(c) A detailed description of the landowner’s current land and water use and management practices that affect the covered species,
 and the habitat of the covered species, for which the landowner requests incidental take authorization.

(d) A detailed description of the landowner’s future land and water use and management practices that may affect the covered species, and the habitat of the covered species, for which the landowner requests incidental take authorization. This description shall be used only for informational and
 planning purposes.

(e) The proposed duration of the agreement that is sufficient to provide a net conservation benefit to the species covered in the permit and an explanation of the basis for this conclusion.

(f) A detailed description of the proposed management actions and the timeframe for implementing them.

(g) A description of the possible incidental take that may be caused by the management actions and of the anticipated species populations and habitat changes over the duration of the permit.

(h) A detailed description of the proposed monitoring program.

(i) Any other information that the department may reasonably require in order to
 evaluate the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.9.

(a) As used in this section, “proprietary information” means information that is all of the following:

(1) Related to an agricultural operation or land that is a part of an agricultural operation.

(2) A trade secret, or commercial or financial information, that is privileged or confidential, and is identified as such by the person providing the information to the department.

(3) Not required to be disclosed under any other provision of law or any regulation affecting the land or the agricultural operation on the land.

(b) Proprietary information received by the department pursuant to Section 2089.8 is not public information, and the department shall not release or disclose the proprietary information to any person, including any
 federal, state, or local governmental agency, outside of the department.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department may release or disclose proprietary information received pursuant to Section 2089.8 to the following entities under the following circumstances:

(1) Any person or federal, state, or local governmental agency, to enforce this article.

(2) Any person or federal, state, or local governmental agency working in cooperation with the department to provide technical or financial assistance for the purposes of implementing the program established by this article.

(3) Any entity, to the extent that the owner, operator, or producer has consented to the release or disclosure.

(4) The general public, if the information has been transformed into a statistical or aggregate form without identifying any individual owner, operator, or producer, or the specific
 location from which the information was gathered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.10.

If an agreement has been approved and the department finds that the agreement is being properly implemented, the department shall allow the landowner to alter or modify the enrolled property, even if that alteration or modification will result in the incidental take of a listed species, to the extent that the alteration or modification returns the species to baseline conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.12.

(a) Unless the department determines that it is inappropriate to do so based on the nature of the management actions being proposed, the species listed in the permit, or other factors, the agreement shall require that the landowner provide the department with at least 60 days’ advance notice of any of the following:

(1) Any incidental take that is anticipated to occur under the agreement.

(2) The landowner’s plan to return to baseline at the end of the agreement.

(3) Any plan to transfer or alienate the landowner’s interest in the land or water.

(b) (1) If the department receives any notice described in subdivision (a), the landowner shall provide the department, its contractors, or agents with access to the land or water for purposes of safely removing or salvaging the species.

(2) The department shall provide notice to the landowner at least seven days prior to accessing the land or water for the purposes of paragraph (1). The notice shall identify each person selected by the department, its contractors, or agents to access the land or water.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), during the seven-day notice period, a landowner may object, in writing, to a person selected to access the land or water. If a landowner objects, another person shall be selected by the department, its contractors, or agents, and notification shall be provided to the
 landowner pursuant to paragraph (2). However, if a landowner objects to a selection on two successive occasions, the landowner shall be deemed to consent to access to the land or water by a person selected by the department, its contractors, or agents. Failure by a landowner to object to the selection within the seven-day notice period shall be deemed consent to access the land or water by a person selected by the department, its contractors, or agents.

(4) If the landowner objects to a person selected to access the land or water pursuant to paragraph (3), the 60-day notice period described in subdivision (a) shall be tolled for the period between the landowner’s objection to a person selected for access to the land or water and the landowner’s consent to a person selected for access to the land or water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 66.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.14.

An agreement may be amended with the mutual consent of the landowner and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.16.

If a landowner seeks to sell, transfer, or otherwise alienate the land or water enrolled in the agreement during the term of the agreement, the person or entity assuming that interest in the property shall (a) assume the existing landowner’s duties under the agreement, (b) enter into a new agreement with the department, or (c) withdraw from an existing agreement under the terms provided in the agreement, as approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.18.

The suspension and revocation of the agreement shall be governed by suspension and revocation regulations adopted by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.20.

(a) This section does not provide the public a right of entry onto the enrolled land or water. The landowner shall provide the department, its contractors, or agents with access to the land or water proposed to be enrolled in the agreement to develop the agreement, determine the baseline conditions, monitor the effectiveness of management actions, or safely remove or salvage species proposed to be taken.

(b) The department shall provide notice to the landowner at least seven days before accessing the land or water for the purposes of subdivision (a). The notice shall identify each person selected by the department, its contractors, or agents to access the land or water.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), during the seven-day notice period, a landowner may object, in writing, to a person selected to access the land or water. If a landowner objects, another person shall be selected by the department, its contractors, or agents, and notification shall be provided to the landowner pursuant to subdivision (b). However, if a landowner objects to a selection on two successive occasions, the landowner shall be deemed to consent to access to the land or water by a person selected by the department, its contractors, or agents. Failure by a landowner to object to the selection within the seven-day notice period shall be deemed consent to access the land or water by a person selected by the department, its contractors, or agents.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the landowner is not required to do either of the following:

(A) Maintain enrolled land or water, or land or water proposed to be enrolled in an agreement, in a condition that is safe for access, entry, or use by the department, its contractors, or agents for purposes of providing access pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) Provide to the department, its contractors, or agents, any warning of a hazardous condition, use, structure, or activity on enrolled land or water, or land or water proposed to be enrolled in an agreement, for purposes of providing access pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the landowner shall not be liable for any injury, and does not owe a duty of care, to the department, its contractors, or agents resulting from any act or omission described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1).

(3) The provision
 of access to land pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be construed as any of the following:

(A) An assurance that the land or water is safe.

(B) A grant to the person accessing the land or water of a legal status for which the landowner would owe a duty of care.

(C) An assumption of responsibility or liability for any injury to a person or property caused by any act of the person to whom access to the land or water is provided.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, this subdivision shall not be construed to limit a landowner’s liability for an injury under either of the following circumstances:

(A) Willful or malicious failure to guard or warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on the land or water.

(B) Express invitation to a person by the landowner to access the land or water, in a manner that is
 beyond the access required to be provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) Nothing in this section creates a duty of care or a ground of liability for injury to person or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.22.

(a) If any of the following agreements have been approved pursuant to applicable provisions of federal law and the federal agreement contains species that are endangered, threatened, candidate, or declining or vulnerable species pursuant to this chapter, no further authorization or approval is necessary under this article for any person authorized by that federal agreement to take the species identified in and in accordance with the federal agreement, if that person and the department follow all of the procedures specified in Section 2080.1, except that the determination of consistency shall be made by the department based only on the issuance criteria contained in this article:

(1) A federal safe harbor agreement.

(2) A federal candidate conservation agreement with assurances.

(3) A federal conservation benefit agreement with an enhancement of survival permit in compliance with Part 17 (commencing with Section 17.1) of Subchapter B of Chapter I of Title 50 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
